Utah statutes.
17D-2-106.   Publications in newspapers.

A publication made under this chapter may be made in a newspaper conforming to the terms of this chapter and in which legal notices may be published under the law, without regard to whether the newspaper is designated as the local entity's official journal or newspaper.

